Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-128
Rear clip, defined.

Rear clip means two or more of the following, all dismantled from the same vehicle: A quarter panel or fender; a floor panel assembly; or a trunk lid or gate.

Laws 2005, LB 276, § 28.